Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-202.01
Secretary of State; match and verify citizenship of registered voter; Attorney General; Department of Motor Vehicles; cooperate.

The Secretary of State shall develop a process to use the information in possession of or available to his or her office to match and verify the citizenship of the corresponding registered voter. The process developed shall ensure that no registered voter is removed from the voter registration register in violation of state or federal law. The Attorney General and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall cooperate with the Secretary of State for such purpose. The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2023, LB514, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 11.